sms/test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-haask_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - hääʹsǩ class A40e: # Adjective 'fun/hauska' - full paradigm
    hääʹsǩ+A+Pred+Sg: hääʹsǩ
    hääʹsǩ+A+Pred+Pl: hääʹsǩ
    hääʹsǩ+A+Attr: hääʹsǩes
    hääʹsǩ+A+Comp: hääʹsǩab
    hääʹsǩ+A+Superl: hääʹsǩmõs
